lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių sportas > Riedslidės: Sveikatingumo riedslidės; Bekelės riedslidės; Lenktyninės riedslidės; Pramoginės riedslidės; Miesto riedslidės
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile > Schiuri pe role: Schiuri pe role pentru fitness; Schiuri cu role pentru teren accidentat; Schiuri pe role pentru curse; Schiuri pe role de agrement; Schiuri pe role de oraș
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Patin à roulettes et roller > Rollerskis: Rollerskis de fitness; Ski-roues tout-terrain; Rollerskis de course; Rollerskis récréatifs; Rollerskis urbains
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Inline og rulleskøyter > Rulleski: Fitness-rulleski; Terrengrulleski; Racing-rulleski; Fritidsrulleski; Urban-rulleski
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰 > 轮式滑雪板: 健身轮式滑雪板; 全地形越野滑轮; 竞赛轮式滑雪板; 休闲轮式滑雪板; 城市轮式滑雪板
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Rulleskøjter og inlinere > Rulleski: Rulleski – fitness; Offroad-rulleski; Rulleski – race; Rulleski – fritid; Rulleski – urban
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Skaten > Rollskis: Fitness-Rollskier; Offroad-Rollski; Rollskier für Rennen; Freizeit-Rollskier; Urban-Rollski
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Inlineskaten en rollerskaten > Rolski's: Fitness-rolski's; Off-road-rolski's; Race-rolski's; Recreatie-rolski's; Urban rolski's
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Inline- och rullskridskoåkning > Rullskidor: Fitnessrullskidor; Offroad-rullskidor; Racingrullskidor; Fritidsrullskidor; Stadsrullskidor
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > In-line a kolečkové brusle > Kolečkové lyže: Fitness kolečkové lyže; Terénní kolečkové lyže; Závodní kolečkové lyže; Rekreační kolečkové lyže; Urban kolečkové lyže
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazda na inline a kolieskových korčuliach > Kolieskové bežky: Fitness kolieskové bežky; Terénne kolieskové lyže; Závodné kolieskové bežky; Rekreačné kolieskové bežky; Mestské kolieskové bežky
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на ролери и ролкови кънки > Ролер ски: Ролер ски за спортни тренировки; Ролкови ски за офроуд; Състезателни ролер ски; Ролер ски за дълги разстояния; Ролер ски за градска среда
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Rolanje in kotalkanje > Tekaške smuči: Tekaške smuči za fitnes; Rolke za tek na smučeh; Tekmovalne tekaške smuči; Tekaške smuči za rekreacijo; Mestne tekaške smuči
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale > Sci a rotelle: Skiroll per fitness; Skiroll da fuoristrada; Skiroll da gara; Skiroll ricreativi; Skiroll urbani
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea > Esquís sobre ruedas: Esquís sobre ruedas para fitness; Esquís sobre ruedas todoterreno; Esquís sobre ruedas para competición; Esquís sobre ruedas de recreación; Esquís sobre ruedas urbanos
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Inline & Roller Skating > Roller Skis: Fitness Roller Skis; Off-Road Roller Skis; Race Roller Skis; Recreation Roller Skis; Urban Roller Skis
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > อินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต > โรลเลอร์สกี: โรลเลอร์สกีเพื่อฟิตเนส; โรลเลอร์สกีวิบาก; โรลเลอร์สกีสำหรับแข่ง; โรลเลอร์สกีเพื่อสันทนาการ; โรลเลอร์สกีสำหรับสัญจรในเมือง
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Rolanje i koturanje > Skijaške role: Skijaške role za fitness; Skijaške role za terensku vožnju; Skijaške role za utrke; Skijaške role za rekreaciju; Skijaške role za ulicu
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng > Trượt tuyết pa tanh: Ski trượt pa-tanh thể dục; Ván trượt tuyết patin địa hình; Ski trượt pa-tanh thi đấu; Ski trượt pa-tanh giải trí; Ski trượt pa-tanh đô thị
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 直排輪/雙排輪 > 滑輪雪板: 健身滑輪雪板; 越野滑輪鞋; 競速滑輪雪板; 休閒滑輪雪板; 城市滑輪雪板
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Inline- és görkorcsolya > Görkorcsolya-sílécek: Fitneszgörkorcsolya-sílécek; Terep görsílécek; Versenygörkorcsolya-sílécek; Szabadidősgörkorcsolya-síléc; Városi görkorcsolya-sílécek
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jazda na wrotkach i łyżworolkach > Narty rollerski: Nartorolki fitness; Nartorolki terenowe; Nartorolki wyścigowe; Nartorolki rekreacyjne; Nartorolki miejskie
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Patinação inline e sobre rodas > Patins inline: Esquis de rodas fitness; Roller skis off-road; Esquis de rodas de corrida; Esquis de rodas de recreação; Esquis de rodas urbanos
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Πατινάζ εντός & εκτός δρόμου > Πέδιλα σκι με ρόδες: Ρόλερ σκι γυμναστικής; Ρόλερ σκι εκτός δρόμου; Αγωνιστικά ρόλερ σκι; Ψυχαγωγικά ρόλερ σκι; Αστικά ρόλερ σκι
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas > Esquis com rodas: Esquis com rodas para fitness; Esquis com rodas todo-o-terreno; Esquis com rodas para corrida; Esquis com rodas recreativos; Esquis com rodas urbanos
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > インラインスケート・ローラースケート > ローラー スキー: フィットネス用ローラースキー; オフロードローラースキー; レース用ローラースキー; リクリエーション用ローラースキー; アーバンローラースキー
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на роликах > Лыжероллеры: Фитнес-лыжероллеры; Внедорожные лыжероллеры; Лыжероллеры для скоростного катания; Прогулочные лыжероллеры; Лыжероллеры для городского катания
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 인라인/롤러 스케이팅 > 롤러 스키: 피트니스 롤러 스키; 오프로드 롤러스키; 레이싱 롤러 스키; 취미용 롤러 스키; 도시형 롤러 스키
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Inline ve Roller Paten > Tekerlekli Kaykay: Fitness Tekerlekli Kaykay; Arazi tekerlekli kayakları; Yarış Tekerlekli Kaykay; Rekreasyon Tekerlekli Kaykay; Kentsel Tekerlekli Kaykay
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Rullaluistelu > Rullasukset: Rullasukset fitnesskäyttöön; Maastorullahiihtosukset; Rullasukset kilpakäyttöön; Rullasukset vapaa-ajan käyttöön; Rullasukset kaupunkikäyttöön